Nevada, session 83, AB78.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 369.190 is hereby amended to read as follows:
369.190 1. An application for any of the licenses described in
NRS 369.180 must be made to:
-
*AB78*

– 3 –
(a) The board of county commissioners of the county in which
the applicant maintains his or her principal place of business if the
applicant does not maintain his or her principal place of business
within the boundaries of an incorporated city; or
(b) The governing body of the city in which the applicant
maintains his or her principal place of business if the applicant
maintains his or her principal place of business within the
boundaries of an incorporated city.
2. Each application must:
(a) Be made on such form as the Department prescribes.
(b) Include the name and address of the applicant. If the
applicant is:
(1) A partnership, the application must include the names
and addresses of all partners.
(2) A corporation, association or other organization, the
application must include the names and addresses of the president,
vice president, secretary and managing officer or officers.
(3) A person carrying on or transacting business in this state
under an assumed or fictitious name, the person making the
application must attach to the application:
(I) A certified copy of the certificate required by NRS
602.010 or any renewal certificate required by NRS 602.035.
(II) A certificate signed by an officer of the corporation or
by each person interested in, or conducting or carrying on such
business, or intending so to do, and acknowledged before a person
authorized to take acknowledgments of conveyances of real
property, indicating the name of the authorized representative whose
signature may be required on the license under the provisions of this
chapter.
(c) Specify the location, by street and number, of the premises
for which the license is sought.
(d) Be accompanied by the annual license fee required for the
particular license for which application is made.
3. The board of county commissioners or the governing body
of a city, as applicable, shall examine all applications filed with it,
and shall require satisfactory evidence that the applicant is:
(a) A person of good moral character;
(b) Not acting in violation of NRS 369.180; [and]
(c) Not applying for a license for a business in which the
applicant is prohibited from engaging pursuant to NRS 369.382 [.] ;
and
(d) Not applying for a license for a business in which the
applicant is prohibited from engaging pursuant to NRS 597.220.
-
*AB78*

– 4 –
Sec. 2. NRS 369.200 is hereby amended to read as follows:
369.200 1. The board of county commissioners or the
governing body of a city, as applicable, shall [approve or disapprove
applications. If an application is disapproved by the board of county
commissioners or the governing body of a city, the board or the
governing body, as applicable, forthwith shall return the license fee
accompanying the application to the applicant. If the board of
county commissioners or the governing body of a city approves an
application, the] review an application submitted pursuant to NRS
369.190 and determine whether to recommend that the application
be approved or disapproved by the Department. The board or the
governing body, as applicable, shall forward [it] to the Department
[, together with the board’s or the governing body’s] :
(a) The application;
(b) All documents supplied by the applicant which were
reviewed by the board or governing body in determining whether
to recommend that the application be approved or disapproved;
(c) The written [approval thereof and the] recommendation of
the board or governing body; and
(d) The license fee accompanying the application.
2. Upon receipt thereof the Department shall review the
application and [approval,] recommendation and, if [no further
objections are presented or known,] all requirements of law are
met, shall issue the appropriate license to the applicant. If an
application is disapproved by the Department, the Department
forthwith shall return the license fee accompanying the
application to the applicant.
[3. In its discretion, the Department may grant an applicant
whose application has been disapproved a new hearing before the
Department if it shall be made to appear to the Department that the
decision of the board of county commissioners or the governing
body of a city, as applicable, was arbitrary, unreasonable or unjust.]
Sec. 3. NRS 369.230 is hereby amended to read as follows:
369.230 The Department, the board of county commissioners
or the governing body of a city, as applicable, may, upon its own
motion, and shall, upon the verified complaint in writing of any
person, investigate the action of any licensee under this chapter . [,
and] The Department shall have the power to temporarily suspend
or permanently revoke a license and the board of county
commissioners or the governing body of a city, as applicable, shall
have power to recommend the temporary suspension or permanent
revocation of a license for any one of the following acts or
omissions:
1. Misrepresentation of a material fact by the applicant in
obtaining a license under this chapter;
-
*AB78*

– 5 –
2. If the licensee violates or causes or permits to be violated
any of the provisions of this chapter;
3. If the licensee commits any act which would be sufficient
ground for the denial of an application for a license under this
chapter;
4. If the licensee sells liquor to a wholesaler or retailer who is
not a holder of a proper license or permit at such time; or
5. If the licensee fails to pay the excise tax or any penalty in
connection therewith, in whole or in part, imposed by law, or
violates any regulation of the Department respecting the same.
Sec. 4. NRS 369.240 is hereby amended to read as follows:
369.240 1. Upon the filing with the Department, the board of
county commissioners of the county in which a licensee maintains
his or her principal place of business or [with] the governing body
of the city in which the licensee maintains his or her principal place
of business , if the licensee maintains his or her principal place of
business within an incorporated city , of a verified complaint
charging the licensee with the commission, within 1 year prior to the
date of filing the complaint, of any act which is cause for suspension
or revocation of a license, the Department, the board of county
commissioners or the governing body, as applicable, forthwith shall
issue a citation directing the licensee, within 10 days after service
thereof upon him or her, to appear by filing with the Department,
the board of county commissioners or the governing body, as
applicable, a verified answer to the complaint showing cause, if any
he or she has, why his or her license should not be suspended or
revoked. Service of the citation with a copy of the complaint shall
be made upon the licensee as provided by the Nevada Rules of Civil
Procedure for the service of process in civil actions. Upon
application of a licensee, the Department, the board of county
commissioners or the governing body, as applicable, may, for good
cause shown, extend by not more than 30 days the time for filing
an answer to the complaint.
2. Failure of the licensee to timely file an answer [within the
time specified] shall be deemed an admission by the licensee of the
commission of the act or acts charged in the complaint. Thereupon,
if the complaint was filed with the board of county commissioners
or the governing body of a city, the board of county commissioners
or the governing body, as applicable, shall give written notice of the
failure of the licensee to answer to the Department. The Department
forthwith shall suspend or revoke the license, as the case may be,
and shall give notice of such suspension or revocation by mailing a
true copy thereof, by United States registered or certified mail in a
sealed envelope with postage thereon fully prepaid, addressed to the
-
*AB78*

– 6 –
licensee at his or her latest address of record in the office of the
Department.
Sec. 5. NRS 369.250 is hereby amended to read as follows:
369.250 1. Upon the filing of the answer, the Department,
the board of county commissioners or the governing body of a city,
as applicable, shall fix a time and place for a hearing and give the
licensee and the complainant not less than 5 days’ notice thereof.
The notice may be served by [depositing] :
(a) Depositing in the United States mail a true copy of the notice
enclosed in a sealed envelope with postage thereon fully prepaid,
addressed to the licensee and to the complainant, respectively, at
their last known addresses [.] ; or
(b) Electronic mail if the licensee or complainant, as
applicable, agrees to receive service in this manner.
2. With the notice to the complainant , there shall be attached
or enclosed a copy of the answer. If either party has appeared by
counsel the notice shall be given, in like manner, to counsel instead
of to the party.
Sec. 6. NRS 369.260 is hereby amended to read as follows:
369.260 1. Upon the hearing, the Department, the board of
county commissioners or the governing body of a city, as
applicable, shall hear all relevant and competent evidence offered by
the complainant and by the licensee.
2. After the hearing is concluded and the matter submitted, [the
board of county commissioners or the governing body of a city, as
applicable, shall,] within 10 days after such submission and within
60 days after the date of service of the citation issued pursuant to
NRS 369.240 [,] or, if the time for filing an answer to the
complaint was extended, within 90 days after the date of service of
such citation:
(a) If the hearing was held before the board of county
commissioners or the governing body of a city, the board or
governing body, as applicable, shall render its decision in writing
recommending the suspension or revocation of the license, or
dismissing the complaint, with a statement of the board’s or the
governing body’s reasons therefor.
(b) If the hearing was held before the Department, the
Department shall render its decision in writing suspending or
revoking the license, or dismissing the complaint, with a statement
of the Department’s reasons therefor.
3. The Department, the board of county commissioners or the
governing body of a city, as applicable, shall give to the
complainant and to the licensee, or their respective attorneys, notice
of such [recommendation,] decision, by mail [,] or electronic mail,
-
*AB78*

– 7 –
in the same manner as prescribed in this chapter for the giving of
notice of hearing.
4. A copy of the decision of the board of county commissioners
or the governing body of a city recommending the suspension or
revocation of a license shall be transmitted forthwith by the board or
the governing body, as applicable, to the Department. [Thereupon,]
Upon receiving such decision, the Department [shall] may cause
the license to be suspended or revoked and , if the Department
suspends or revokes the license, the Department shall give notice
thereof in the same manner as provided in NRS 369.240.
Sec. 7. NRS 369.270 is hereby amended to read as follows:
369.270 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of this
chapter, before suspending or revoking any license, the Department,
in its discretion, may:
(a) If the licensee has not appeared pursuant to the provisions of
NRS 369.240, permit the licensee to appear before the Department,
the board of county commissioners or the governing body of a city,
as applicable, and make a showing on his or her behalf if it is made
to appear to the Department that the licensee’s neglect to appear
before the Department, the board of county commissioners or the
governing body was excusable.
(b) If a hearing was had [,] before the board of county
commissioners or the governing body of a city, grant the licensee a
new hearing before the Department if it shall be made to appear to
the Department that the decision of the board of county
commissioners or the governing body of a city, as applicable, was
arbitrary, unreasonable or unjust.
2. After any new hearing before the Department, the
Department shall enter a final order revoking or refusing to revoke
the license affected.
Sec. 8. NRS 369.280 is hereby amended to read as follows:
369.280 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of this
chapter, the board of county commissioners or the governing body
of a city, as applicable, shall have the right to suspend or revoke
summarily any license in cases appearing to it to be of an
aggravated and flagrant violation of law.
2. On request, in all such cases, the Department shall conduct a
hearing [covering] to review the proceedings and evidence, if any,
[before] relied upon by the board of county commissioners or the
governing body of a city, as applicable, in summarily suspending
or revoking the license and any additional evidence offered by the
board of county commissioners, the governing body or the licensee.
3. The hearing before the Department pursuant to subsection 2
shall be had on reasonable notice of time, place and subject matter
to the licensee and the board of county commissioners or the
-
*AB78*

– 8 –
governing body of a city, as applicable, and the Department shall
decide the matter without delay by either confirming, modifying or
setting aside the action of the board of county commissioners or the
governing body, as applicable.
4. [If] Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter,
the Department [finds that a licensee is violating any of the
provisions of this chapter, the Department may issue a summary
suspension of the violator’s license.] shall have the right to suspend
or revoke summarily any license in cases appearing to it to be of
an aggravated and flagrant violation of law. The Department shall
notify the board of county commissioners or the governing body of
a city, as applicable, of such suspension [.] or revocation. Within 10
days after such notice the Department shall conduct a public hearing
in the matter . [in the appropriate county or city, as applicable.] The
board of county commissioners or the governing body of a city, as
applicable, may appear before the Department at the hearing.
Sec. 9. NRS 244.350 is hereby amended to read as follows:
244.350 1. The board of county commissioners and, in a
county whose population is less than 700,000, the sheriff of that
county, constitute a liquor board. The liquor board may, without
further compensation, grant or refuse liquor licenses, and revoke
those licenses whenever there is, in the judgment of a majority of
the board, sufficient reason for revocation. The board shall elect a
chair from among its members.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the liquor
board in each of the several counties shall enact ordinances:
(a) Regulating the sale of intoxicating liquors in their respective
counties.
(b) Fixing the hours of each day during which liquor may be
sold or disposed of.
(c) Prescribing the conditions under which liquor may be sold or
disposed of.
(d) Prohibiting the employment or service of minors in the sale
or disposition of liquor.
(e) Prohibiting the sale or disposition of liquor in places where,
in the judgment of the board, the sale or disposition may tend to
create or constitute a public nuisance, or where by the sale or
disposition of liquor a disorderly house or place is maintained.
3. In a county whose population is 700,000 or more, the liquor
board shall refer any petition for a liquor license to the metropolitan
police department. The department shall conduct an investigation
relating to the petition and report its findings to the liquor board at
the next regular meeting of the board.
-
*AB78*

– 9 –
4. All liquor dealers within any incorporated city are exempt
from the effect of this section, and are to be regulated only by the
government of that city.
5. The liquor board may deny or refuse to renew the license of
a person who has willfully violated the provisions of NRS 369.630
more than three times in any 24-month period.
6. The liquor board shall not deny a license to a person solely
because the person is not a citizen of the United States.
7. The liquor board shall not issue a license to a person who
is required to obtain a license from the Department of Taxation
pursuant to chapter 369 of NRS unless the Department has issued
such a license and the license is in good standing.
8. The Legislative Counsel Bureau is exempt from the
provisions of this section with respect to the purchase and sale of
souvenir wine pursuant to NRS 218F.430.
Sec. 10. NRS 268.090 is hereby amended to read as follows:
268.090 1. In addition to any authority or power now
provided by the charter of any incorporated city in this State,
whether incorporated by general or special act, or otherwise, except
as otherwise provided in this section, there is hereby granted to each
of the cities incorporated under any law of this State the power and
authority to fix, impose and collect a license tax on, and regulate the
sale of, beer, wines or other beverages now or hereafter authorized
to be sold by act of Congress.
2. An incorporated city may deny or refuse to renew the license
of a person who has willfully violated the provisions of NRS
369.630 more than three times in any 24-month period.
3. An incorporated city shall not deny a license to a person
solely because the person is not a citizen of the United States.
4. An incorporated city shall not issue a license to a person
who is required to obtain a license from the Department of
Taxation pursuant to chapter 369 of NRS unless the Department
has issued such a license and the license is in good standing.
5. The Legislative Counsel Bureau is exempt from the
provisions of this section with respect to the purchase and sale of
souvenir wine pursuant to NRS 218F.430.
H
-
*AB78*